Utah statutes.
72-2-106.   Appropriation from Transportation Fund -- Transportation-Fund
Highway Rehabilitation Restricted Account.
(1)  On and after July 1, 1981, there is appropriated from the Transportation
Fund to the use of the department an amount equal to two-elevenths of the
taxes collected from the motor fuel tax and the special fuel tax, exclusive of
the formula amount appropriated to the B and C road fund and the collector
road fund, to be used for highway rehabilitation.
(2)  All of this money shall be placed in an account known as the
"Transportation Fund - Highway Rehabilitation Restricted Account."
